Utah statutes.
53-11-112.   Licensure -- Bail recovery apprentices -- Requirements and limitations.

(1)  In addition to the requirements in Sections 53-11-108 and 53-11-113, an applicant for licensure as a bail recovery apprentice shall meet all of the requirements under Section 53-11-109, except the applicant is not subject to the experience requirement under Subsection 53-11-109(1)(a).

(2)  A bail recovery apprentice may work as a licensee only:

(a)  as an employee or contract employee of a bail bond agency; and

(b)  under the direct supervision of a bail enforcement agent or bail recovery agent employed also by the bail enforcement agent, unless the bail recovery apprentice is conducting activities at the direction of the employing bail enforcement agent that under this chapter do not require direct supervision.

(3)  A bail recovery apprentice may not:

(a)  advertise his services;

(b)  provide services as a licensee under this chapter directly for members of the public; or

(c)  employ or hire as independent contractors bail enforcement agents, bail recovery agents, or bail recovery apprentices.



Enacted by Chapter 257, 1998 General Session

